cs: Typ audiokazety: Typ I (normální/feritový); Typ II (chrom/vysoké předpětí); Typ III (ferichrom); Typ IV (kovový); Jiné
zh-TW: 音訊卡帶類型: 類型 I (一般/鐵氧體); 類型 II (鉻/高偏壓); 類型 III (鐵鉻); 類型 IV (金屬); 其他
fi: Äänikasetin nauhatyyppi: Tyyppi I (normaali/ferriitti); Tyyppi II (kromi/korkea bias); Tyyppi III (ferrikromi); Tyyppi IV (metalli); Muu
es: Tipo de cinta de casete de audio: Tipo I (normal/férrico); Tipo II (cromo/alto sesgo); Tipo III (ferricromo); Tipo IV (metal); Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de fita cassete de áudio: Tipo I (normal/férrico); Tipo II (crómio/alta polarização); Tipo III (ferrocrómio); Tipo IV (metal); Outro
ro-RO: Tip de bandă casetă audio: Tip I (normal/feric); Tip II (crom/polarizare înaltă); Tip III (fericrom); Tip IV (metal); Altele
ru: Тип аудиокассетной ленты: Тип I (обычная/ферритовая); Тип II (хромовая/высокий уровень); Тип III (феррихромовая); Тип IV (металлическая); Другой
bg-BG: Тип лента за аудиокасета: Тип I (нормална/ферична); Тип II (хромова/висок байъс); Тип III (ферихромова); Тип IV (метална); Други
vi: Loại băng cassette âm thanh: Loại i (thường/ferric); Loại ii (chrome/high bias); Loại iii (ferrichrome); Loại iv (kim loại); Khác
fr: Type de bande de cassette audio: Type I (Normal/ferrique); Type II (Chrome/haute polarisation); Type III (Ferrichrome); Type IV (Métal); Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de fita cassete de áudio: Tipo I (normal/férrica); Tipo II (cromo/alta polarização); Tipo III (ferrocromo); Tipo IV (metal); Outro
tr: Ses kaset bant tipi: Tip I (Normal/Ferrik); Tip II (Krom/Yüksek Bias); Tip III (Ferrikrom); Tip IV (Metal); Diğer
lt-LT: Garso kasetės juostos tipas: I tipas (normalus/feritinis); II tipas (chromuotas/aukšto poslinkio); III tipas (ferichrominis); IV tipas (metalinis); Kita
en: Audio cassette tape type: Type I (Normal/Ferric); Type II (Chrome/High Bias); Type III (Ferrichrome); Type IV (Metal); Other
nl: Type audiocassetteband: Type I (normaal/ferriet); Type II (chroom/hoge bias); Type III (ferrichroom); Type IV (metaal); Andere
it: Tipo di nastro audiocassetta: Tipo I (normale/ferrico); Tipo II (cromo/alta polarizzazione); Tipo III (ferricromo); Tipo IV (metallo); Altro
da: Lydkassettebåndtype: Type I (Normal/Ferric); Type II (Chrome/High Bias); Type III (Ferrichrome); Type IV (Metal); Andet
de: Audiokassetten-Bandtyp: Typ I (Normal/Eisenoxid); Typ II (Chrom/High Bias); Typ III (Ferrichrom); Typ IV (Metall); Sonstiges
el: Τύπος ταινίας κασέτας ήχου: Τύπος I (κανονική/σιδηρομαγνητική); Τύπος II (χρώμιο/υψηλή πόλωση); Τύπος III (σιδηροχρώμιο); Τύπος IV (μεταλλική); Άλλο
nb: Lydkassettbåndtype: Type I (Normal/ferritt); Type II (Krom/high bias); Type III (Ferrikrom); Type IV (Metall); Annet
zh-CN: 音频磁带类型: I 型（普通/铁磁）; II 型（铬/高偏）; III 型（铁铬）; IV 型（金属）; 其他
hr-HR: Tip audio kazete: Tip I (normalna/feritna); Tip II (krom/visoka pristranost); Tip III (ferikrom); Tip IV (metalna); Ostalo
th: ประเภทเทปคาสเซ็ตเสียง: ชนิด I (ปกติ/เฟอริก); ชนิด II (โครม/ไฮไบแอส); ชนิด III (เฟอริโครม); ชนิด IV (เมทัล); อื่นๆ
ko: 오디오 카세트 테이프 유형: 타입 I (노멀/페릭); 타입 II (크롬/하이 바이어스); 타입 III (페리크롬); 타입 IV (메탈); 기타
sk-SK: Typ pásky audio kazety: Typ I (normálna/feritová); Typ II (chrómová/vysoké skreslenie); Typ III (ferochrómová); Typ IV (kovová); Iné
sl-SI: Tip avdio kasete: Tip I (normalni/železov); Tip II (krom/visok); Tip III (železokrom); Tip IV (kovinski); Drugo
pl: Typ taśmy kasetowej audio: Typ I (normalny/żelazowy); Typ II (chromowy/wysoki bias); Typ III (żelazowo-chromowy); Typ IV (metalowy); Inne
sv: Ljudkassettbandtyp: Typ I (normal/ferrit); Typ II (krom/high bias); Typ III (ferrikrom); Typ IV (metall); Övrigt
ja: オーディオカセットテープタイプ: タイプI（ノーマル/フェリック）; タイプII（クロム/ハイバイアス）; タイプIII（フェリクロム）; タイプIV（メタル）; その他
hu: Audio-kazettaszalag típusa: I. típus (normál/vasoxidos); II. típus (króm/nagy előfeszítésű); III. típus (ferrikróm); IV. típus (fém); Egyéb